Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.190

Costs in proceedings not specifically covered.

In all actions and proceedings other than those mentioned in this chapter [and RCW 4.48.100], where no provision is made for the recovery of costs, they may be allowed or not, and if allowed may be apportioned between the parties, in the discretion of the court.

[Code 1881 s 525; 1877 p 111 s 529; 1854 p 204 s 387; RRS s 493.]

NOTES:

Costs: RCW 4.84.080.